Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.045

Minimum medical and health standards.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law after February 19, 1974 no law enforcement officer or firefighter, may become eligible for coverage in the pension system established by this chapter, until the individual has met and has been certified as having met minimum medical and health standards: PROVIDED, That an elected sheriff or an appointed chief of police or fire chief, shall not be required to meet the age standard: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in cities and towns having not more than two law enforcement officers and/or not more than two firefighters and if one or more of such persons do not meet the minimum medical and health standards as required by the provisions of this chapter, then such person or persons may join any other pension system that the city has available for its other employees: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That for one year after February 19, 1974 any such medical or health standard now existing or hereinafter adopted, insofar as it establishes a maximum age beyond which an applicant is to be deemed ineligible for coverage, shall be waived as to any applicant for employment or reemployment who is otherwise eligible except for his or her age, who has been a member of any one or more of the retirement systems created by chapter 41.20 of the Revised Code of Washington and who has restored all contributions which he or she has previously withdrawn from any such system or systems.

(2) This section shall not apply to persons who initially establish membership in the retirement system on or after July 1, 1979.

[ 2012 c 117 s 40; 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 20; 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 41.26.030.

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.